Utah statutes.
76-8-303.   Prevention of Legislature or public servants from meeting or organizing.

A person is guilty of a felony of the third degree if he intentionally and by force or fraud:

(1)  Prevents the Legislature, or either of the houses composing it, or any of the members thereof, from meeting or organizing; or

(2)  Prevents any other public servant from meeting or organizing to perform a lawful governmental function.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

